Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 3
SENTENCES TO IMPRISONMENT

16-11-301. Sentences - commitments - correctional facilities - county jail - age limit.

As a general rule, imprisonment for the conviction of a felony by an adult offender shall be served by confinement in an appropriate facility as determined by the executive director of the department of corrections. In such cases, the court will sentence the offender to the custody of the executive director of the department of corrections.

Unless otherwise provided in the "Colorado Children's Code", title 19, C.R.S., a defendant convicted of a crime which may be punished by imprisonment in a county jail may be sentenced to a correctional facility other than state correctional facilities if at the time of sentencing the defendant is sixteen years of age or older but under the age of twenty-one years, and if, in the opinion of the court, rehabilitation of the person convicted can best be obtained by such a sentence, and if it also appears to the court that the best interests of the person and of the public and the ends of justice would thereby be served.

Repealed.

With regard to any juvenile sentenced to the department of corrections, the executive director shall consider the juvenile's safety and well-being in determining the facility in which to house the juvenile, the persons with whom the juvenile has contact, and the activities in which the juvenile engages.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 248, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-301.

L. 79:

(1) and (2) amended and (3) repealed, pp. 679, 705, §§ 6, 88, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 53, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(4) added, p. 1680, § 4, effective January 1, 1997.

16-11-302. Duration of sentences for felonies. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 248, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-302.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 546, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 864, § 8, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 664, § 3, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 680, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1137, § 1, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to section 18-1.3-404.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-302.5. Duration of sentences for misdemeanors. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 665, § 4, effective August 1; entire section amended, p. 680, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1359, § 9, effective June 28.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 816, § 18, effective October 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1689, § 19, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to section 18-1.3-502.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-303. Definite sentence not void. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 249, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-303.

L. 77:

Entire section repealed, p. 888, § 78, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 79:

Entire section RC&RE, p. 665, § 5, effective August 1; entire section amended, p. 681, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to section 18-1.3-508.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-304. Determinate sentence of imprisonment imposed by court. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 249, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-304.

L. 73:

p. 503, § 2.

L. 76:

(2)(b) amended, p. 530, § 2, effective April 9; (2)(a) amended, p. 547, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 864, § 9, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 665, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 1151, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to section 18-1.3-408.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-305. Sentence not void if for definite period. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 249, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-305.

L. 73:

p. 504, § 3.

L. 77:

Entire section repealed, p. 888, § 78, effective July 1, 1979.

16-11-306. Credit for presentence confinement. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 249, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-306.

L. 73:

p. 506, § 1.

L. 74:

(4) amended, p. 408, § 25, effective April 11.

L. 77:

(3) amended, p. 865, § 10, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 79:

Entire section R&RE, p. 665, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 734, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 663, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to section 18-1.3-405.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-307. Credit for confinement pending appeal.

A defendant whose sentence was stayed pending appeal prior to July 1, 1972, but who was confined pending disposition of the appeal, is entitled to credit against the maximum and minimum terms of his sentence for the entire period of confinement served while the stay of execution was in effect.

A defendant whose sentence is stayed pending appeal after July 1, 1972, but who is confined pending disposition of the appeal, is entitled to credit against the term of his sentence for the entire period of such confinement, and this is so even though the defendant could have elected to commence serving his sentence before disposition of his appeal.

The sheriff or other officer having charge of the defendant during such confinement shall endorse the length of such confinement on the mittimus and deliver it to the prison authorities when the defendant is delivered for commitment.

The credit shall be computed by the prison authorities to the date of commitment. The computation shall be made as soon as practicable and the credit automatically awarded. The defendant shall be advised of the credit as soon as it is computed.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 249, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-307.

L. 73:

p. 507, § 1.

L. 79:

(1)(b) amended, p. 666, § 8, effective July 1.

16-11-308. Custody of department of corrections - procedure.

When any person is sentenced to any correctional facility, that person shall be deemed to be in the custody of the executive director of the department of corrections or his designee.

Any person sentenced pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall initially be confined in the diagnostic center, as defined in section 17-40-101 (1.5), C.R.S., unless otherwise authorized by the executive director or the executive director's designee, to undergo evaluation and diagnosis to determine whether such person should be confined in a correctional facility or any other state institution, or whether such person should participate in a rehabilitation program as provided by law; except that no person subject to the provisions of section 16-11-301 (2) shall serve such person's sentence in any state correctional facility.

When such evaluation and diagnosis is completed, a recommendation shall be made to the executive director of the department of corrections or his designee as to the place of confinement or rehabilitation program as provided by law which may result in the maximum rehabilitation of the offender.

Copies of the evaluation and diagnosis and the recommendation shall be shown and explained to the offender upon request; except that the executive director of the department of corrections or his designee may withhold any information he deems to be detrimental to the rehabilitation of the offender.

(4.5) Repealed.

The executive director of the department of corrections or his designee is further authorized to transfer said person to any state institution or treatment facility under the jurisdiction of or approved by the department of corrections if he deems it to be in the best interests of said person and the public. Insofar as is practicable, said transfer shall be consistent with the evaluation and diagnosis and recommendation.

Source:

L. 74:

Entire section added, p. 240, § 1, effective May 7.

L. 77:

(1), (3), (4), and (5) amended, p. 901, § 3, effective August 1.

L. 78:

(2) amended, p. 356, § 1, effective April 27.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 681, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 53, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 27, § 3, effective March 20.

L. 2000:

(4.5) added, p. 1027, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(4.5)(a)(I) amended, p. 957, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(4.5)(a) amended, p. 1151, § 5, effective July 1; (4.5)(a)(I) amended, p. 1496, § 146, October 1.

L. 2006:

(4.5)(c) added by revision, pp. 1689, 1693, §§ 5, 17.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4.5)(c) provided for the repeal of subsection (4.5), effective July 1, 2007. (See L. 2006, pp. 1689, 1693.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (4.5)(a)(I), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-308.5. Authority to contract with a county or a city and county for placement of prisoners in custody of executive director.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the department of corrections needs to reduce the backlog of state prisoners in local jails and that such reduction may occur by means of contracting with local jails for jail space in an amount equal to the number of inmates backlogged in local jails. The general assembly also finds and declares that it is the general assembly's intent that the department of corrections cooperate with each contracting county or city and county to select inmates for placement who will eventually be released in that county, city and county, or geographic area, or who have special protective needs, or who have occupational skills or plans that are compatible with the county's or city and county's needs.

(1.5) For the purposes of this section, "local jail" means a jail or an adult detention center of a county or city and county.

The executive director of the department of corrections may enter into a contract with any county or city and county for the placement in a local jail of any person who is in the custody of the executive director. Subject to appropriations, the executive director may provide an incentive to any county or city and county to encourage such county or city and county to so contract. The incentive shall not exceed ten percent of the daily rate as determined pursuant to section 17-1-112, C.R.S., multiplied by the number of days of confinement of any such person in such local jail.

In any such placement in a local jail, the executive director shall be governed by the provisions of section 16-11-308 and shall retain jurisdiction over any person so placed for the purpose of any transfer to a state institution or treatment facility pursuant to section 16-11-308 (5).

Except for contracts executed in the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1988, the board of county commissioners in each county or city council of each city and county desiring to contract with the department of corrections shall notify said department, on or before September 1 of each year, of the jail space available for contract on July 1 of the following year.

Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1988, the department of corrections shall execute contracts with counties or city and counties indicating a willingness to contract for available jail space as soon as is practicable after July 1, 1988.

Beginning with budget requests required to be submitted by November 1, 1988, the executive director of the department of corrections shall include the costs of contracting for jail space in the department's annual budget request to be submitted to the joint budget committee.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 676, § 1, effective July 1; entire section added, p. 709, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) to (4) amended and (1.5) added, p. 339, § 4, effective May 24.

L. 93:

(1.5) and (2)(a) amended, p. 406, § 4, effective April 19.

Cross references:

For the authority of counties to enter into contracts with the executive director of the department of corrections, see § 30-11-101 (1)(h).

16-11-309. Mandatory sentences for violent crimes. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 76:

Entire section added, p. 547, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 902, § 4, effective July 13; (1) amended and (3) repealed, pp. 865, 888, §§ 11, 78, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 666, § 9, effective August 1.

L. 81:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 944, § 1, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 971, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(2)(a), (4), and (5) amended and (6) and (7) added, pp. 314, 315, §§ 3, 4, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2)(a)(I) amended, p. 682, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1)(a) amended, p. 647, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 679, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(8) added, p. 875, § 9, effective June 5.

L. 91:

(1)(b), (2)(a)(I), and (2)(b) amended, p. 1781, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(b), (2)(a)(I), and (2)(b) amended, p. 1633, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1)(b) amended and (2) R&RE, pp. 1714, 1715, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2)(c) amended, p. 1096, § 13, effective May 31; (1)(b) repealed, p. 1250, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1)(c) added, p. 1291, § 9, effective November 1, 1998.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to section 18-1.3-406.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-310. Release from incarceration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 865, § 12, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 79:

Entire section R&RE, p. 666, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section repealed, p. 715, § 25, effective July 1.

16-11-311. Sentences - youthful offenders - legislative declaration - powers and duties of district court - authorization for youthful offender system - powers and duties of department of corrections - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire section added, p. 13, § 5, effective September 13.

L. 94:

(2)(a) amended, p. 909, § 4, effective April 28; (2)(a), (2)(b), (4), (5)(a), (5)(c), (6), and (10)(a) amended and (2.1), (3.3), and (3.4) added, p. 2089, § 1, effective June 3; (2)(a) amended and (10)(d) added, pp. 2584, 2585, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(4.5) added and (5)(a) amended, p. 871, § 3, effective May 24; (2)(a)(I) and IP(2.1)(a) amended, p. 1096, § 14, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(2)(a)(I), (3.3)(c), and (3.4)(b) amended, p. 1145, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(b), (2)(a)(I), IP(2.1)(a), and (10)(d) amended, p. 1689, § 20, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 98:

(10)(a), (10)(b), and (10)(d) amended, p. 725, § 3, effective May 18.

L. 99:

(10)(a) and (13) amended, p. 43, § 1, effective March 15; (1)(b) and (2)(a)(I) amended, p. 1371, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(c), (1)(d), (3.4)(d), and (4.3) added and (2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(II), (2)(a.5), (3)(e), (3.3)(b)(II), (3.4)(b), (3.4)(c), (5), (8), and (10)(c) amended, p. 1003, §§ 1, 2, 3, effective May 26; (11.5) added, p. 925, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(3.4)(d) amended, p. 1490, § 11, effective June 8; (2)(a)(IV) added and (3.3)(d) amended, p. 231, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(11.5) amended, p. 1151, § 6, effective July 1; (11.5)(a)(I) amended, p. 1183, § 14, effective July 1; (10)(a) and (10)(c) amended, p. 881, § 19, effective August 7; entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsections (10)(a) and (10)(c) in House Bill 02-1352 and amendments to subsection (11.5)(a)(I) in Senate Bill 02-019 and Senate Bill 02-010 were harmonized with House Bill 02-1046 and relocated to section 18-1.3-407.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-312. Intensive family preservation program - juveniles sentenced to the youthful offender system - legislative declaration - development of a plan for a pilot program - duty of department - report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 2067, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1995. (See L. 94, p. 2067.)